Utah statutes.
65A-8-105.   Urban and community forestry program.

(1)  An urban and community forestry program is created within the division.

(2)  The purpose of the program is to encourage the planting and maintenance of trees within municipalities and unincorporated communities.

(3)  The division may:

(a)  advise and assist municipalities, counties, and other public and private entities in developing and coordinating policies, programs, and activities promoting urban and community forestry;

(b)  receive, by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures, federal funds for the urban and community forestry program; and

(c)  provide grants to municipalities and counties for urban and community forestry programs and cooperative projects.

(4)  The division shall:

(a)  develop a public education program to inform tree care professionals and citizens of the hazards involved with the planting of new trees and the maintenance of existing trees near overhead power lines and highways; and

(b)  develop and implement a program of public awareness to inform citizens about the benefits of planting trees in urban areas and how to maintain trees.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

